Louisiana, session 2026, HB1050.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:405.1 and 408(B)(2)(a)(ii) and (b) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§405.1. Age requirements
Subject to R.S. 32:407, a Class "E" driver's license or a Class "D" chauffeur's
license shall be granted to a person seventeen years of age or above older. Class
"A", "B", or "C" licenses shall be granted only to persons eighteen years of age or
above older. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a first time applicant for
a Class "E" license who is an eighteen year old years of age or older or the parent or
guardian of a first time applicant who is seventeen year old first time applicant for
a Class "E" license years of age shall provide a signed statement to the department
attesting that the applicant has completed a minimum of fifty hours of supervised
driving practice with a licensed parent, guardian, or adult at least age twenty-one
years of age or older. However, if the first time applicant for a Class "E" license is
seventeen years of age and emancipated, the applicant shall provide the attestation
for himself, provided that the applicant has the necessary identifying information and
documents. At least fifteen of these hours must be nighttime driving. However,
hazardous materials endorsements shall be issued only to persons twenty-one years
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1050 ENROLLED
of age or above. A commercial driver's license authorizing the operation of a
commercial motor vehicle in intrastate commerce may be issued to a person eighteen
years of age or older. A commercial driver's license authorizing the operation of
commercial motor vehicle in interstate commerce, or a commercial driver's license
with a hazardous materials endorsement, shall be issued only to a person twenty-one
years of age or older. The age limitations are subject to the minimum age
requirements set forth in the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 and the
regulations promulgated thereunder relative to licensing of carriers in interstate
commerce.
* * *
§408. Examination of applicants required; classes of licenses
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) A commercial driver's license shall be required when a vehicle is used
in commerce as defined in this Chapter, and is a commercial motor vehicle as
defined in this Chapter. A farmer shall not need a commercial driver's license when
operating a motor vehicle as provided for in Subparagraph (e) of this Paragraph. The
department may elect to or, if required by the Federal Highway Administration, shall
change the weight and passenger limits expressed herein to conform to regulations
by the Federal Highway Administration. The department shall do so by regulations
promulgated in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act subject to
oversight by the Joint Legislative Committee on Transportation, Highways and
Public Works. A commercial learner's permit issued to an individual of this state or
another jurisdiction, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Federal Motor
Carrier Safety Administration, when carried with a valid driver's license issued by
the same state or jurisdiction, authorizes the permittee to operate a class of
commercial motor vehicle when accompanied by a holder of a valid commercial
driver's license for purposes of behind-the-wheel training. When issued to the holder
of a commercial driver's license, a commercial learner's permit serves as
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1050 ENROLLED
authorization to take part in behind-the-wheel training in a commercial motor vehicle
for which the driver is not licensed to drive. The different classes of drivers' licenses
to be issued shall be as follows:
(a)
* * *
(ii) Restriction. An individual who takes a skills test for a Class "A"
Commercial Driver's License in a motor vehicle other than a tractor-trailer
combination, sometimes referred to as an "eighteen wheeler", shall be issued a
license with a restriction prohibiting the operation of a tractor-trailer combination.
This restriction shall be lifted only if the individual successfully completes a skills
test in a tractor-trailer combination. For purposes of this Item, a power unit with a
gross vehicle weight rating of less than twenty-six thousand one pounds shall not
qualify as the tractor portion of a tractor-trailer combination. An individual who
takes a skills test for a Class "A" commercial driver's license in a motor vehicle with
the power unit and towed unit connected with a pintel hook or other non-fifth wheel
connection, shall be issued a license with a restriction prohibiting the operation of
a tractor-trailer combination connected by a fifth wheel that requires a Class "A"
commercial driver's license. This restriction shall be lifted only if the individual
successfully completes a skills test in a Class "A" vehicle connected with a fifth
wheel.
(b) Class "B" Commercial Driver's License - "Heavy Straight Vehicle".
Permits the operation of any vehicle within Classes "C", "D", and "E", with
any appropriate endorsements, plus any single vehicle with which has a gross vehicle
weight rating or gross vehicle weight of twenty-six thousand and one or more
pounds, or any such vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or
gross vehicle weight that does not exceed ten thousand pounds. not in excess of ten
thousand pounds gross vehicle weight. A "straight vehicle" is defined for the
purpose of this class as being one that does not bend or have any moveable joint in
its frame between the driver's seat and the cargo or passenger compartment. This
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1050 ENROLLED
class does not include the operation of motorcycles and motor scooters except as an
endorsement to the basic license.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 32:408(B)(7) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.